Nebraska, session 109, LB102.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB102 LB102
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 43-513, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-513 (1) The standard of need represents the regular recurring
monthly amount necessary for basic subsistence and is part of the initial
income test in determining eligibility for aid to dependent children
benefits using the Budget the Gap Methodology described in subdivision
(1)(p) of section 68-1713.
(2) Effective July 1, 2026, the standard of need for a single
individual shall be one thousand one hundred thirty-two dollars and fifty
cents plus three hundred ninety-three dollars for each additional
individual in the aid to dependent children unit.
(3) The standard of need for aid to dependent children payments
shall be adjusted on July 1 of every second year beginning July 1, 2026
1997. The adjustment shall be made on the basis of the rate of growth of
the Consumer Price Index as determined by the United States Department of
Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the two previous calendar year
years.
(4) The standard of need is also used to calculate a unit's aid to
dependent children benefit amount. The aid to dependent children payment
made shall not be greater than the amount specified by section 43-512.
Sec. 2. Original section 43-513, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-